tests/v_кала_del.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "The verb кала":
    кала<v><tv><pres><p1><sg> : калатӑп
    кала<v><tv><pres><p2><sg> : калатӑн
    кала<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : калать
    кала<v><tv><pres><p1><pl> : калатпӑр
    кала<v><tv><pres><p2><pl> : калатӑр
    кала<v><tv><pres><p3><pl> : калаҫҫӗ
    кала<v><tv><past><p1><sg> : каларӑм
    кала<v><tv><past><p2><sg> : каларӑн
    кала<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : каларӗ
    кала<v><tv><past><p1><pl> : каларӑмӑр
    кала<v><tv><past><p2><pl> : каларӑр
    кала<v><tv><past><p3><pl> : каларӗҫ
    кала<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : калам
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : кала
    кала<v><tv><imp><p3><sg> : калатӑр
    кала<v><tv><imp><p1><pl> : калар
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><pl> : калӑр
    кала<v><tv><imp><p3><pl> : калаччӑр
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><sg>+сӑм<mod> : каласӑм
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><sg>+ччӗ<mod> : калаччӗ
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><sg>+сӑм<mod>+ччӗ<mod> : каласӑмччӗ
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><sg>+сӑм<mod>+ха<mod> : каласӑм-ха
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><sg>+ччӗ<mod>+ха<mod> : калаччӗ-ха
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><sg>+сӑм<mod>+ччӗ<mod>+ха<mod> : каласӑмччӗ-ха
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><pl>+сӑм<mod> : каласӑмӑр
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><pl>+ччӗ<mod> : калӑрччӗ
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><pl>+сӑм<mod>+ччӗ<mod> : каласӑмӑрччӗ
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><pl>+сӑм<mod>+ха<mod> : каласӑмӑр-ха
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><pl>+ччӗ<mod>+ха<mod> : калӑрччӗ-ха
    кала<v><tv><imp><p2><pl>+сӑм<mod>+ччӗ<mod>+ха<mod> : каласӑмӑрччӗ-ха
    кала<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : калӑп
    кала<v><tv><fut><p2><sg> : калӑн
    кала<v><tv><fut><p3><sg> : калӗ
    кала<v><tv><fut><p1><pl> : калӑпӑр
    кала<v><tv><fut><p2><pl> : калӑр
    кала<v><tv><fut><p3><pl> : калӗҫ
    кала<v><tv><cond><p1><sg> : калӑттӑм
    кала<v><tv><cond><p2><sg> : калӑттӑн
    кала<v><tv><cond><p3><sg> : калӗччӗ
    кала<v><tv><cond><p1><pl> : калӑттӑмӑр
    кала<v><tv><cond><p2><pl> : калӑттӑр
    кала<v><tv><cond><p3><pl> : калӗччӗҫ
    кала<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : калӑпин
    кала<v><tv><opt><p2><sg> : калӑсӑн
    кала<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : калин
    кала<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : калӑпӑрин
    кала<v><tv><opt><p2><pl> : калӑсӑр
    кала<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : калӗҫин
    кала<v><tv><abil><pres><p1><sg> : калаятӑп
    кала<v><tv><abil><pres><p2><sg> : калаятӑн
    кала<v><tv><abil><pres><p3><sg> : калаять
    кала<v><tv><abil><pres><p1><pl> : калаятпӑр
    кала<v><tv><abil><pres><p2><pl> : калаятӑр
    кала<v><tv><abil><pres><p3><pl> : калаяҫҫӗ
    кала<v><tv><iter><pres><p1><sg> : калакалатӑп
    кала<v><tv><iter><pres><p2><sg> : калакалатӑн
    кала<v><tv><iter><pres><p3><sg> : калакалать
    кала<v><tv><iter><pres><p1><pl> : калакалатпӑр
    кала<v><tv><iter><pres><p2><pl> : калакалатӑр
    кала<v><tv><iter><pres><p3><pl> : калакалаҫҫӗ
    кала<v><tv><iter><cond><p1><sg> : калакалӑттӑм
    кала<v><tv><iter><cond><p2><sg> : калакалӑттӑн
    кала<v><tv><iter><cond><p3><sg> : калакалӗччӗ
    кала<v><tv><iter><cond><p1><pl> : калакалӑттӑмӑр
    кала<v><tv><iter><cond><p2><pl> : калакалӑттӑр
    кала<v><tv><iter><cond><p3><pl> : калакалӗччӗҫ
